Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
92F

UNIFORM
INFORMATION PRACTICES ACT (MODIFIED)

Part I. General Provisions and Definitions

Section

92F-1 Short title

92F-2 Purposes; rules of construction

92F-3 General definitions

92F-4 Funding, services, and other federal
assistance

Part II. Freedom of Information

92F-11 Affirmative agency disclosure
responsibilities

92F-12 Disclosure required

92F-13 Government records; exceptions to
general rule

92F-14 Significant privacy interest; examples

92F-15 Judicial enforcement

92F-15.3 Notice to the office of information
practices

92F-15.5 Alternative method to appeal a denial of
access

92F-16 Immunity from liability

92F-17 Criminal penalties

92F-18 Agency implementation

92F-19 Limitations on disclosure of government

records to other agencies

Part III. Disclosure of Personal Records

92F-21 Individual's access to own personal
record

92F-21.5 Repealed

92F-22 Exemptions and limitations on individual
access

92F-23 Access to personal record; initial
procedure

92F-24 Right to correct personal record;
initial procedure

92F-25 Correction and amendment; review
procedures

92F-26 Rules

92F-27 Civil actions and remedies

92F-27.5 Alternative method to appeal a denial of
access

92F-28 Access to personal records by order in
judicial

or administrative proceedings; access as

authorized or required by other law

Part IV. Office of Information Practices;
Duties

92F-41 Office of information practices;
established

92F-42 Powers and duties of the office of
information

practices

92F-43 Agency appeal of a decision by the
office of

information practices

Note

Advisory opinions and guidelines interpreting this chapter
are contained in the Uniform Information Practices Act Reference Manual as
published by the office of information practices.

Personal information protection requirements. L Sp 2008, c
10, §§7 to 15.

Cross References

Access Hawaii Committee (management of State's internet
portal), see chapter 27G.

Access/legislative information service, see chapter 21D.

Destruction of personal information records, see chapter
487R.

Information privacy and security council; personal
information security, see §§487N-5 to 7.

Personal information policy and oversight responsibilities
for government agencies, see §487J-5.

Personal information protection, see chapter 487J.

Privacy of consumer financial information, see §§431:3A-101
to 504.

Retail merchant club card requirements, see chapter 487D.

Security breach of personal information, see chapter 487N.

Uniform electronic transactions act, see chapter 489E.

Law Journals and Reviews

2013 Law and Administrative Rules Governing Appeal Procedures
of Hawaii's Office of Information Practices. 36 UH L. Rev. 271 (2014).

Case Notes

Chapter did not require defendant to disclose development
proposals. 74 H. 365, 846 P.2d 882.

Chapter applies prospectively, requiring disclosure of
records maintained by state agencies regardless of when the records came into
existence. 83 H. 378, 927 P.2d 386.

Chapter not a "conflicting statute on the same subject
matter" as chapter 89, within the meaning of §89-19, and thus is not
preempted by chapter 89 or any collective bargaining agreement negotiated under
it. 83 H. 378, 927 P.2d 386.

Confidentiality provision in police union's collective
bargaining agreement with city unenforceable where provision prevents police
department from performing its duties under this chapter. 83 H. 378, 927 P.2d
386.

Where trial court determined that any unaccepted engineering
reports were returned to the developer and there was a lack of evidence
suggesting that the city planning and permitting department
"maintained" any reports or copies of the reports that were
unaccepted by the department, trial court properly determined that, pursuant to
this chapter, the reports submitted to the department in connection with the
developer's subdivision application did not constitute "government
records" prior to their acceptance by the department. 119 H. 90, 194 P.3d
531.

As judicial financial disclosure statements are judicial
records, created and governed by rule 15 of the rules of the supreme court,
promulgated by the court pursuant to its inherent and constitutional judicial
authority to regulate judges, and the authority to promulgate rules and keep
records with regard to judicial qualification and discipline matters (1) fall
within the scope of the court's power to adjudicate, and (2) is inherently
intertwined with such adjudicative power, the rules and records are not subject
to this chapter or review by the office of information practices. 121 H. 179,
215 P.3d 411.

In a suit deciding whether disclosure of county council
executive session minutes was required, circuit court properly found that both
chapter 92 and this chapter applied; if the meeting met an exception to the
open meeting requirements put forth in chapter 92, such as an exception
enumerated in §92-5, the council was not required to disclose the minutes of
that meeting to the public; if the meeting did not fall under such an
exception, the council was required to disclose the minutes pursuant to §92-9
and §92F-12. 120 H. 34 (App.), 200 P.3d 403.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next